Illinois, session 104th, HB1189.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Prevailing Wage Act is amended by changing 5Sections 2 and 11 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 130/2)7    Sec. 2. This Act applies to the wages of laborers, 8mechanics and other workers employed in any public works, as 9hereinafter defined, by any public body and to anyone under 10contracts for public works. This includes any maintenance, 11repair, assembly, or disassembly work performed on equipment 12whether owned, leased, or rented.13    As used in this Act, unless the context indicates 14otherwise:15    "Public works" means all fixed works constructed or 16demolished by any public body, or paid for wholly or in part 17out of public funds. "Public works" as defined herein includes 18all projects financed in whole or in part with bonds, grants, 19loans, or other funds made available by or through the State or 20any of its political subdivisions, including but not limited 21to: bonds issued under the Industrial Project Revenue Bond Act 22(Article 11, Division 74 of the Illinois Municipal Code), the 23Industrial Building Revenue Bond Act, the Illinois Finance   HB1189 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07452 SPS 17493 b1Authority Act, the Illinois Sports Facilities Authority Act, 2or the Build Illinois Bond Act; loans or other funds made 3available pursuant to the Build Illinois Act; loans or other 4funds made available pursuant to the Riverfront Development 5Fund under Section 10-15 of the River Edge Redevelopment Zone 6Act; or funds from the Fund for Illinois' Future under Section 76z-47 of the State Finance Act, funds for school construction 8under Section 5 of the General Obligation Bond Act, funds 9authorized under Section 3 of the School Construction Bond 10Act, funds for school infrastructure under Section 6z-45 of 11the State Finance Act, and funds for transportation purposes 12under Section 4 of the General Obligation Bond Act. "Public 13works" also includes all federal construction projects 14administered or controlled by a public body if the prevailing 15rate of wages is equal to or greater than the prevailing wage 16determination by the United States Secretary of Labor for the 17same locality for the same type of construction used to 18classify the federal construction project. "Public works" also 19includes (i) all projects financed in whole or in part with 20funds from the Environmental Protection Agency under the 21Illinois Renewable Fuels Development Program Act for which 22there is no project labor agreement; (ii) all work performed 23pursuant to a public private agreement under the Public 24Private Agreements for the Illiana Expressway Act or the 25Public-Private Agreements for the South Suburban Airport Act; 26(iii) all projects undertaken under a public-private agreement   HB1189 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07452 SPS 17493 b1under the Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act 2or the Department of Natural Resources World Shooting and 3Recreational Complex Act; and (iv) all transportation 4facilities undertaken under a design-build contract or a 5Construction Manager/General Contractor contract under the 6Innovations for Transportation Infrastructure Act. "Public 7works" also includes all projects at leased facility property 8used for airport purposes under Section 35 of the Local 9Government Facility Lease Act. "Public works" also includes 10the construction of a new wind power facility by a business 11designated as a High Impact Business under Section 125.5(a)(3)(E) and the construction of a new utility-scale solar 13power facility by a business designated as a High Impact 14Business under Section 5.5(a)(3)(E-5) of the Illinois 15Enterprise Zone Act. "Public works" also includes electric 16vehicle charging station projects financed pursuant to the 17Electric Vehicle Act and renewable energy projects required to 18pay the prevailing wage pursuant to the Illinois Power Agency 19Act. "Public works" also includes power washing projects by a 20public body or paid for wholly or in part out of public funds 21in which steam or pressurized water, with or without added 22abrasives or chemicals, is used to remove paint or other 23coatings, oils or grease, corrosion, or debris from a surface 24or to prepare a surface for a coating. "Public works" does not 25include work done directly by any public utility company, 26whether or not done under public supervision or direction, or   HB1189 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07452 SPS 17493 b1paid for wholly or in part out of public funds. "Public works" 2also includes construction projects performed by a third party 3contracted by any public utility, as described in subsection 4(a) of Section 2.1, in public rights-of-way, as defined in 5Section 21-201 of the Public Utilities Act, whether or not 6done under public supervision or direction, or paid for wholly 7or in part out of public funds. "Public works" also includes 8construction projects that exceed 15 aggregate miles of new 9fiber optic cable, performed by a third party contracted by 10any public utility, as described in subsection (b) of Section 112.1, in public rights-of-way, as defined in Section 21-201 of 12the Public Utilities Act, whether or not done under public 13supervision or direction, or paid for wholly or in part out of 14public funds. "Public works" also includes any corrective 15action performed pursuant to Title XVI of the Environmental 16Protection Act for which payment from the Underground Storage 17Tank Fund is requested. "Public works" also includes all 18construction projects involving fixtures or permanent 19attachments affixed to light poles that are owned by a public 20body, including street light poles, traffic light poles, and 21other lighting fixtures, whether or not done under public 22supervision or direction, or paid for wholly or in part out of 23public funds, unless the project is performed by employees 24employed directly by the public body. "Public works" also 25includes work performed subject to the Mechanical Insulation 26Energy and Safety Assessment Act. "Public works" also includes   HB1189 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07452 SPS 17493 b1the removal, hauling, and transportation of biosolids, lime 2sludge, and lime residue from a water treatment plant or 3facility and the disposal of biosolids, lime sludge, and lime 4residue removed from a water treatment plant or facility at a 5landfill. "Public works" does not include projects undertaken 6by the owner at an owner-occupied single-family residence or 7at an owner-occupied unit of a multi-family residence. "Public 8works" does not include work performed for soil and water 9conservation purposes on agricultural lands, whether or not 10done under public supervision or paid for wholly or in part out 11of public funds, done directly by an owner or person who has 12legal control of those lands. 13    "Construction" means all work on public works involving 14laborers, workers or mechanics. This includes any maintenance, 15repair, assembly, or disassembly work performed on equipment 16whether owned, leased, or rented.17    "Locality" means the county where the physical work upon 18public works is performed, except (1) that if there is not 19available in the county a sufficient number of competent 20skilled laborers, workers and mechanics to construct the 21public works efficiently and properly, "locality" includes any 22other county nearest the one in which the work or construction 23is to be performed and from which such persons may be obtained 24in sufficient numbers to perform the work and (2) that, with 25respect to contracts for highway work with the Department of 26Transportation of this State, "locality" may at the discretion   HB1189 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07452 SPS 17493 b1of the Secretary of the Department of Transportation be 2construed to include two or more adjacent counties from which 3workers may be accessible for work on such construction.4    "Public body" means the State or any officer, board or 5commission of the State or any political subdivision or 6department thereof, or any institution supported in whole or 7in part by public funds, and includes every county, city, 8town, village, township, school district, irrigation, utility, 9reclamation improvement or other district and every other 10political subdivision, district or municipality of the state 11whether such political subdivision, municipality or district 12operates under a special charter or not.13    "Labor organization" means an organization that is the 14exclusive representative of an employer's employees recognized 15or certified pursuant to the National Labor Relations Act. 16    The terms "general prevailing rate of hourly wages", 17"general prevailing rate of wages" or "prevailing rate of 18wages" when used in this Act mean the hourly cash wages plus 19annualized fringe benefits for training and apprenticeship 20programs approved by the U.S. Department of Labor, Bureau of 21Apprenticeship and Training, health and welfare, insurance, 22vacations and pensions paid generally, in the locality in 23which the work is being performed, to employees engaged in 24work of a similar character on public works.25(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 1-1-22; 102-444, eff. 8-20-21; 26102-673, eff. 11-30-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1094, eff.   HB1189 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07452 SPS 17493 b16-15-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-327, eff. 1-1-24; 103-346, 2eff. 1-1-24; 103-359, eff. 7-28-23; 103-447, eff. 8-4-23; 3103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 4    (820 ILCS 130/11)  (from Ch. 48, par. 39s-11)5    Sec. 11. No public works project shall be instituted 6unless the provisions of this Act have been complied with. The 7provisions of this Act shall not be applicable to federal 8Federal construction projects that which require a prevailing 9wage determination by the United States Secretary of Labor, 10except as described in Section 2. The Illinois Department of 11Labor represented by the Attorney General is empowered to sue 12for injunctive relief against the awarding of any contract or 13the continuation of work under any contract for public works 14at a time when the prevailing wage prerequisites have not been 15met. Any contract for public works awarded at a time when the 16prevailing wage prerequisites had not been met shall be void 17as against public policy and the contractor is prohibited from 18recovering any damages for the voiding of the contract or 19pursuant to the terms of the contract. The contractor is 20limited to a claim for amounts actually paid for labor and 21materials supplied to the public body. Where objections to a 22determination of the prevailing rate of wages or a court 23action relative thereto is pending, the public body shall not 24continue work on the project unless sufficient funds are 25available to pay increased wages if such are finally   HB1189 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07452 SPS 17493 b1determined or unless the Department of Labor certifies such 2determination of the prevailing rate of wages as correct.3    Any laborer, worker or mechanic employed by the contractor 4or by any sub-contractor under him who is paid for his services 5in a sum less than the prevailing rates for work done under 6such contract, shall have a right of action for whatever 7difference there may be between the amount so paid, and the 8rates provided by the contract together with costs and such 9reasonable attorney's fees as shall be allowed by the court. 10Such contractor or subcontractor shall also be liable to the 11Department of Labor for 20% of such underpayments and shall be 12additionally liable to the laborer, worker or mechanic for 13punitive damages in the amount of 2% of the amount of any such 14penalty to the State for underpayments for each month 15following the date of payment during which such underpayments 16remain unpaid. Where a second or subsequent action to recover 17underpayments is brought against a contractor or subcontractor 18and the contractor or subcontractor is found liable for 19underpayments to any laborer, worker, or mechanic, the 20contractor or subcontractor shall also be liable to the 21Department of Labor for 50% of the underpayments payable as a 22result of the second or subsequent action, and shall be 23additionally liable for 5% of the amount of any such penalty to 24the State for underpayments for each month following the date 25of payment during which the underpayments remain unpaid. The 26Department shall also have a right of action on behalf of any   HB1189 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 07452 SPS 17493 b1individual who has a right of action under this Section. An 2action brought to recover same shall be deemed to be a suit for 3wages, and any and all judgments entered therein shall have 4the same force and effect as other judgments for wages. The 5action shall be brought within 5 years from the date of the 6failure to pay the wages or compensation. At the request of any 7laborer, workman or mechanic employed by the contractor or by 8any subcontractor under him who is paid less than the 9prevailing wage rate required by this Act, the Department of 10Labor may take an assignment of such wage claim in trust for 11the assigning laborer, workman or mechanic and may bring any 12legal action necessary to collect such claim, and the 13contractor or subcontractor shall be required to pay the costs 14incurred in collecting such claim.15(Source: P.A. 103-48, eff. 1-1-24.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 172025.